Connecticut, session 2026, HB05326.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 17a-248e of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(d) The lead agency may provide early intervention services, arrange
for the delivery of early intervention services by participating agencies
or contract with providers to deliver early intervention services to
eligible children and the families of such children. The lead agency in
providing, arranging or contracting for early intervention services shall
monitor all birth-to-three service providers for quality and
accountability in accordance with Section 616 of the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 USC 1416 and establish state-wide rates
for such services that are in accordance with the rates posted on the
Internet web site of the Office of Early Childhood pursuant to section 2
of this act.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective from passage) The Office of Early Childhood
shall post the rates enumerated in the report of the most recent
comprehensive rate study and cost analysis of the birth-to-three
program, established under section 17a-248d of the general statutes, on
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5326
the office's Internet web site.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17a-248e(d)
Sec. 2 from passage New section
ED Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
LCO 2 of 2